Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2534
Signing of petition; illegal acts; penalty.

Whoever signs any petition under the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act, knowing that he or she is not a registered voter in the place where such petition is made, aids or abets any other person in doing any of the acts mentioned in this section, bribes or gives or pays any money or thing of value to any person directly or indirectly to induce him or her to sign such petition, or engages in any deceptive practice intended to induce any person to sign a petition, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor with a fine not to exceed three hundred dollars.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 34;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 185.